Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 1. Membership and Organization.

§ 23.1-200.
State Council of Higher Education for Virginia established; purpose; membership; terms; officers.

The State Council of Higher Education for Virginia is established to advocate for and promote the development and operation of an educationally and economically sound, vigorous, progressive, and coordinated system of higher education in the Commonwealth and lead state-level strategic planning and policy development and implementation based on research and analysis and in accordance with §

23.1-301

and subsection A of §

23.1-1002

. The Council shall seek to facilitate collaboration among institutions of higher education that will enhance quality and create operational efficiencies and work with institutions of higher education and their governing boards on board development.

The Council shall be composed of individuals selected from the Commonwealth at large without regard to political affiliation but with due consideration of geographical representation. Nonlegislative citizen members shall have demonstrated experience, knowledge, and understanding of higher education and workforce needs. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be selected for their ability and all appointments shall be of such nature as to aid the work of the Council and inspire the highest degree of cooperation and confidence. No officer, employee, trustee, or member of the governing board of any institution of higher education, employee of the Commonwealth, member of the General Assembly, or member of the Board of Education is eligible for appointment to the Council except as specified in this section. All members of the Council are members at large who shall serve the best interests of the whole Commonwealth. No member shall act as the representative of any particular region or of any particular institution of higher education.

The Council shall consist of 13 members: 12 nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Governor and one ex officio member. At least one nonlegislative citizen member shall have served as a chief executive officer of a public institution of higher education. At least one nonlegislative citizen member shall be a division superintendent or the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The President of the Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority shall serve ex officio with voting privileges.

All terms shall begin July 1.

Nonlegislative citizen members shall serve for terms of four years. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. No nonlegislative citizen member shall serve for more than two consecutive terms; however, a nonlegislative citizen member appointed to serve an unexpired term is eligible to serve two consecutive four-year terms. No nonlegislative citizen member who has served two consecutive four-year terms is eligible to serve on the Council until at least two years have passed since the end of his second consecutive four-year term. All appointments are subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Nonlegislative citizen members shall continue to hold office until their successors have been appointed and qualified. Ex officio members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office.

The Council shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from its membership. The Council shall appoint a secretary and such other officers as it deems necessary and prescribe their duties and terms of office.

At each meeting, the Council shall involve the chief executive officer of each public institution of higher education in its agenda. The chief executive officers shall present information and comment on issues of common interest and choose presenters to the Council from among themselves who reflect the diversity of the institutions.

At each meeting, the Council may involve other groups, including the presidents of private institutions of higher education, in its agenda.

History.

1956, c. 311, § 23-9.3; 1964, c. 597; 1970, c. 117; 1972, c. 210; 1974, c. 544; 1980, c. 728; 1991, c. 590; 2013, c. 605; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314; 2018, c. 202.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

Acts
2019, c. 592 provides “§ 1. Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University and Virginia State University shall jointly develop and report to the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia, the House Committee on Education, and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than October 1, 2019, a plan for the establishment of a baccalaureate or other degree program that prepares graduates to be effective career and technical education teachers in order to address persistent teacher shortages in career and technical education subject areas in the Commonwealth.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, deleted “president or” preceding “chief executive officer” in the second sentence of subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 202 substituted “appointed and qualified” for “appointed and confirmed” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection E.

§ 23.1-201.
Student advisory committee.

The Director of the Council shall appoint a student advisory committee consisting of students enrolled in public institutions of higher education and accredited private institutions of higher education whose primary purpose is to provide collegiate or graduate education and not to provide religious training. Appointments shall be made in a manner to ensure broad student representation from among such institutions.

Members shall serve for terms of one year. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. Members may be reappointed to serve subsequent or consecutive terms.

The Director of the Council shall ensure that at least one member of the student advisory committee is reappointed each year. The student advisory committee shall elect a chairman from among its members.

The student advisory committee shall meet at least twice annually and advise the Director of the Council regarding such matters as may come before it.

History.

2003, c. 710, § 23-9.3:1; 2006, c. 92; 2009, c. 434; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314; 2020, c. 578.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, inserted “institutions of higher education” following “enrolled in public” in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 578 inserted “Director of the” preceding “Council” throughout the section.

§ 23.1-202.
Employment of director and other personnel.

The Council shall appoint and employ a director who shall be the chief executive officer of the Council and employ such other personnel as may be required to assist it in the exercise of its powers and duties.

History.

1956, c. 311, § 23-9.4; 1974, c. 544; 1997, cc. 803, 888, 891; 2002, cc. 591, 612; 2016, c. 588.